District of Columbia statutes.
9-425.02

Notice and design requirements.

(a)

The Mayor shall provide notice to affected parties, the affected Advisory Neighborhood Commissions, and the Councilmembers of the affected Wards, prior to designing and constructing new sidewalks. At a minimum, this notice shall include:

(1)

A statement of intent to design and construct a new sidewalk no less than 60 days before construction is scheduled, including a 30-day period for public comment on the proposed design;

(2)

A statement of how affected parties can comment on the proposed sidewalk, including a statement on how Advisory Neighborhood Commissions can submit resolutions on the potential impact of the proposed sidewalk; and

(3)

A construction schedule.

(b)

The Mayor shall maintain for public review comments from affected parties received pursuant to subsection (a)(2) of this section and responses thereto.

(c)

The Mayor shall design sidewalks in a manner that preserves the health of existing trees wherever possible.

(d)

The recommendations of the affected Advisory Neighborhood Commission shall be given great weight, as that term is described in § 1-309.10(d)(3)(A).

(e)

Whenever feasible, the Mayor shall consider pervious materials for the design and installation of sidewalks.

(f)

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term “affected parties” means residents with property abutting the road segment under consideration.

History

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-227, § 3, 57 DCR 6923